Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2180.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; University of Arizona; AZ REACH; intent A. The sum of $2,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the University of Arizona for AZ REACH. B. The legislature intends that the appropriation made in subsection A of this section be considered ongoing funding in future years.